Utah statutes.
73-18c-301.   Requirement of owner's or operator's security.

(1)  Each resident owner of a motorboat shall maintain owner's or operator's security in effect at any time that the motorboat is operated on waters of the state.

(2)  Each nonresident owner of a motorboat that has been physically present in this state for 90 or fewer days during the preceding 365 days shall maintain the type and amount of owner's or operator's security required in his or her place of residence at any time the motorboat is operated on waters of the state.

(3)  Each nonresident owner of a motorboat that has been physically present in this state more than 90 days during the preceding 365 days shall thereafter maintain owner's or operator's security in effect at any time the motorboat is operated on waters of the state.

(4)  The state and each of its political subdivisions and their respective departments, institutions, or agencies shall maintain owner's or operator's security in effect at any time their personal watercraft are operated on waters of the state.

(5)  Any other state is considered a nonresident owner of its motorboat and is subject to Subsection (2) or (3).

(6)  The United States, any political subdivision of it, or any of its agencies may maintain owner's or operator's security in effect for their motorboats.



Amended by Chapter 211, 2006 General Session

